Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3404
Applicability of act.

The School District Property Tax Limitation Act shall not apply to that portion of a school district's property tax request that is needed to pay the principal and interest on approved bonds.

Laws 2023, LB243, § 4.